Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 7 Retail Licenses
3-7-19.
Objection by adjoining property owners — Proximity to schools and churches.

Retailers’ Class B, C, N and I licenses, and any license provided for in §

3-7-16.8

, shall not be issued to authorize the sale of beverages in any building where the owner of the greater part of the land within two hundred feet (200´) of any point of the building files with the body or official having jurisdiction to grant licenses his or her objection to the granting of the license, nor in any building within two hundred feet (200´) of the premises of any public, private, or parochial school or a place of public worship. In the city of East Providence, retailer’s Class A licenses shall not be issued to authorize the sale of beverages in any building within five hundred feet (500´) of the premises of any public, private, or parochial school, or a place of public worship.

As used in this section, “private school” means any nonpublic institution of elementary or secondary (K-12th grade) education, accredited or recognized as a private school by the department of elementary and secondary education or the school committee of the city or town having jurisdiction over private schools.

This section shall not apply to any Class B or C license holder whose license was issued prior to January 1, 1978, nor shall this section apply to, or constitute the basis of, an objection to, or disapproval of, the transfer of a Class B or C license where the location of the licensed establishment predates the location of the public, private, or parochial school, or place of public worship.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B, C, or I license intended to be located within the following described area(s) in the city of Providence:

Beginning at a point, that point being the intersection of the southerly line of Smith Street and the easterly taking line of Interstate Route 95;

Thence running in a general southwesterly direction along the easterly taking line of Interstate Route 95 to the center line of Kingsley Avenue;

Thence turning and running northwesterly in part along the southerly line of Kingsley Avenue to its intersection with the southerly line of Harris Avenue;

Thence turning and running westerly along the southerly line of Harris Avenue to its intersection with the southerly line of Atwells Avenue;

Thence turning and running easterly along the southerly line of Atwells Avenue to the easterly taking line of Interstate Route 95;

Thence turning and running in a general southerly and southeasterly direction along the easterly taking line of Interstate Route 95 to the center line of Pine Street;

Thence turning and running northeasterly along the northerly taking line of I-195 to its intersection with the northerly taking line of I-195;

Thence turning and running northeasterly along the northerly taking line of I-195 to its intersection with the westerly shore line of the Providence River;

Thence turning and running northerly along the westerly shore line of the Providence River to its intersection with the southerly line of Crawford Street;

Thence running northwesterly across Dyer Street to the intersection of the westerly line of Dyer Street to the southerly line of Custom House Street;

Thence running northerly in part along the southerly line of Dyer Street and in part along the westerly line of Market Square to its intersection with the westerly line of Canal Street;

Thence turning and running northerly along the westerly line of Canal Street to its intersection with the southerly line of Smith Street;

Thence turning and running westerly along the southerly line of Smith Street to the point and place of beginning.

Beginning at a point, that point being the intersection of the westerly line of Brook Street and the northerly line of Wickenden Street;

Thence running in a general westerly direction along the northerly line of Wickenden Street to the intersection of Wickenden Street and Benefit Street;

Thence running in a general northerly direction along the easterly line of Benefit Street to the intersection of Benefit Street and Sheldon Street;

Thence turning and running in an easterly direction along the southerly line of Sheldon Street to the intersection of Sheldon Street and Brook Street;

Thence turning and running in a general southerly line to the intersection of Brook Street and Wickenden Street that being the point of beginning.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Newport shall, after application, have authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located within the following described area in the city of Newport:

Beginning at a point, that point being the intersection of the southerly line of Broadway and the easterly line of Courthouse Square;

Thence running in a general northeasterly direction along the southerly line of Broadway a distance of one hundred and two feet (102´) to a point at the southeasterly corner of land now or formerly owned by the Newport Historical Society;

Thence turning and running in a southeasterly direction ninety-eight and nine-tenths feet (98.9´) along the southwesterly border of land now or formerly owned by the Newport Historical Society;

Thence turning and running in a southwesterly direction one hundred and twelve feet (112´) to Courthouse Street; and

Thence turning and running in a generally northwesterly direction along Courthouse Street for a distance of ninety feet (90´) to the point and place of beginning.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of Warren shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B, C, or I license intended to be located within any zoning district in the town of Warren which is designated as a limited business district or as a general business district pursuant to the zoning ordinance of the town of Warren.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of Bristol shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on lot 34 of tax assessors plat 10 of the Bristol tax assessors map as of December 31, 1999, including that portion of the public sidewalk contiguous to said lot.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses for the city of Newport shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section as to places of public worship any proposed sidewalk cafe as defined in the Codified Ordinance of the city of Newport, provided that the applicant be an existing holder of a Retailers’ Class B license.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on lot 131 of tax assessors plat 68 of the Providence tax assessors map as of December 31, 1999, and any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on lot 21 of the tax assessors map plat 49 and any proposed retailer class BV license intended to be located on lots 3 and 5 of tax assessors map plat 35 of the Providence tax assessors map as of December 31, 2003.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Cranston shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on either lot 160 of tax assessor’s plat 9, and/or on lot 152 of tax assessor’s plat 9, of the Cranston tax assessor’s map as of December 31, 2002; provided, however, as to the subsequent transfer of said Class B license issued by the city of Cranston under this exemption, whether said transfer is attributable to the holder’s death or otherwise, any person desiring to become the potential transferee of said Class B license shall comply with those restrictions as to its use (and shall refrain from those activities which result in its reversion) set forth in the city of Cranston Memorandum of Understanding dated May 13, 2003, and, in addition, those requirements applicable to anyone who desires to become a transferee of a validly issued and outstanding Class B license designated for use in any location in the state of Rhode Island. Neither the exemption granted herein nor any future exemption granted hereafter shall be effective until the proposed Class B license and the underlying property owner is certified to be current in the payment of any and all local and state taxes.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Pawtucket shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B, C, or I license intended to be located within the following described area in the city of Pawtucket:

Beginning at the point of intersection of Dexter Street and the Central Falls line, then east along the Central Falls line to the Blackstone River, then north along the city boundary on the Blackstone River to the Cumberland line, then west along the Pawtucket city boundary line to I-95, then south along I-95 to Pine Street, then north on Pine Street to AMTRAK Right of Way, then northwest along the AMTRAK Right of Way to Dexter Street, then north on Dexter Street to the Central Falls line.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Little Compton, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section relating to places of worship any class B license limited to malt and vinous beverages intended to be located on Plat 30, Lot 33 of the town of Little Compton tax assessment map existing as of December 31, 2004.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of Bristol shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located on lots 3, 18, and 19 of tax assessors plat 10 of the Bristol tax assessors map as of December 31, 2007.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Smithfield, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section, any class B, C, or I license intended to be located on Plat 45, Lot 042 of the town of Smithfield, tax assessment map existing as of December 31, 2007; provided, however, said exemption shall apply only to any renewal of any class B, C, or I license issued for use at the said premises located on plat 45, lot 042 as of December 31, 2011. In the event said license is not renewed, then this exemption is hereby repealed in its entirety.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on plat 13, lots 31 and 32 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of Tiverton shall, after the application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section a proposed retailer’s Class BV license for a restaurant located on tax assessor’s plat 181, lot 1A.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on tax assessor’s plat 68, lot 732.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 105, lot 489, plat 105, lot 12 and plat 32, lot 232 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council of the city of Central Falls, shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 5, lot 188 of the applicable city of Central Falls tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of Portsmouth shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 37, lot 69 of the applicable town of Portsmouth tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of North Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 23A, lot 98 of the applicable town of North Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Cranston shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on Plat 11, lot 3558 of the applicable city of Cranston tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Smithfield, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section, any Class B or C license intended to be located on Plat 6, Lot 54 of the town of Smithfield tax assessors map as of December 31, 2012.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Cranston shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers class B license intended to be located on tax assessors plat 1, lot 2170 of the applicable city of Cranston tax assessment map as of December 31, 2012.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on tax assessor’s plat 43, lot 211.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of North Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on Plat 22A, Lot 336, of the applicable town of North Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council of the city of Central Falls shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 1, lot 164 of the applicable city of Central Falls tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 1948-1950 Westminster Street on plat 35, lot 359 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Middletown, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section, any proposed retailer’s Class BV license intended to be located on Plat 107 NW, Lot 55 of the town of Middletown’s tax assessor’s maps as of December 31, 2014.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any retailer Class B, C or I license intended to be located on Plat 109, Lot 289, of the applicable city of Providence tax assessor’s map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class BV license intended to be located at 226 and 230 Dean Street on plat 25, lot 44 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of East Greenwich shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 219 Main Street on map/lot 085 001 212 0000 of the applicable town of East Greenwich tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of East Greenwich shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 137 Main Street on map/lot 085-001-412; 59 Main Street on map/lot 085-001-236; 555 Main Street on map/lot 075-003-084; 74 Cliff Street on map/lot 075-003-040; 609 Main Street on map/lot 075-003-080; 241 Main Street on map/lot 085-001-208; 155 Main Street on map/lot 085-001-222; 149 Main Street on map/lot 085-001-223; and 2 Academy Court on map/lot 085-001-211 of the applicable Town of East Greenwich tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of Lincoln shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located on tax assessor’s plat 10, lot 108, of the Lincoln tax assessor’s map as of December 31, 2015.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class C license intended to be located at 215 Dean Street on plat 28, lot 961 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 100-102 Hope Street on plat 16, lot 263 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the town of Cumberland shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 88 Broad Street on Lots 32, 51, and 52 of Plat 2 Cumberland tax assessor’s map as of December 31, 2016.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 11 Lowell Avenue, 191 Pocasset Avenue and 187 Pocasset Avenue on Lots 22, 23, and 24 of Plat 108 Providence tax assessor’s map as of December 31, 2017.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council in the city of Central Falls shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on Plat 1, of Lot 171 of the applicable city of Central Falls tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class BV and Class BX license intended to be located at 161 Douglas Avenue on plat 68, lot 201 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 1007 Broad Street, Plat 53, Lot 192 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map and 1017 Broad Street Plat 53, Lot 582 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council in the city of Woonsocket shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 122 North Main Street, Map/Lot 130-125-005 of the applicable city of Woonsocket tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council of the city of Woonsocket, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section, any proposed retailers’ class BV and class BM license intended to be located between 2 Main Street (tax assessor’s plat 14, lot 284) and 194 Main Street (tax assessor’s plat 14, lot 139).

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 375 Smith Street, Plat 68, Lot 132 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 671 Broadway Street, Plat 35, Lot 566 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 464-468 Wickenden Street, also identified as 8 Governor Street, Plat 17, Lot 179 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Westerly shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 114 Granite Street, Westerly, RI 02891, Plat 67, Lot 278 of the applicable town of Westerly tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of Woonsocket shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 43 Railroad Street, Plat 14R, Lot 205 of the applicable city of Woonsocket tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class BL license or Class BV license intended to be located at 601 Hartford Avenue, Plat 113, Lot 50 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Westerly shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 169 and 177 Main Street, Westerly, RI 02891, Map 66, Lots 8 and 9 of the applicable town of Westerly tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council of the city of East Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 332 Bullock Point Avenue, East Providence, RI 02915, Map 312, Block 12, Parcel 018.00 of the applicable city of East Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of license commissioners of the city of Pawtucket shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers Class B, C, or N license intended to be located on Plat 54B, Lots 826 and 827; Plat 65B, Lot 662; and Plat 23A, Lots 599, 672, and 673 of the city of Pawtucket tax assessment map existing as of March 1, 2021.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the town of Jamestown, after application, has the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class BVL license intended to be located at 53 Narragansett Avenue, Plat 9, Lot 207 of the applicable town of Jamestown tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence, shall after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class BV and Class P license intended to be located at 203-209 Douglas Avenue, Plat 68, Lots 83 and 646 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of East Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 130 Taunton Avenue, Map 106, Block 6, Parcel 15 of the applicable city of East Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Barrington shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 305 Sowams Road, Barrington, R.I. 02806, Plat 30, Lot 141 of the applicable town of Barrington tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located at 737 Hope Street, Plat 6, Lot 595 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of Warren shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located at 4 Market Street, Plat 3, Lot 74 of the applicable town of Warren tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Westerly shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 163 Main Street, Westerly, RI 02891, Map 66, Lot 11 of the applicable town of Westerly tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class BL license intended to be located at 777 Elmwood Avenue, Plat 60, Lot 1 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of North Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section, any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on tax assessor’s Plat 19, Lot 617.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located at 12 Governor Street, Plat 17, Lot 180 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any proposed retailer Class B or Class BV licenses intended to be located at 371 Smith Street, Plat 68, Lot 2 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 21; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 51/2; P.L. 1936, ch. 2338, § 4; P.L. 1937, ch. 2522, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 7; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 5; P.L. 1941, ch. 1038, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1708, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 3004, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-19

; P.L. 1962, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 619, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 460, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 514, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 526, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 507, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 534, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 384, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 402, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 508, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 446, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 463, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 303, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 10, § 1, effective May 6, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 11, § 1, effective May 5, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 25, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 71, § 1, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 72, § 1, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 79, § 1, effective June 25, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 243, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 244, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 248, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 249, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 250, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 251, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 11, § 1, effective April 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 13, § 1, effective April 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 16, § 1, effective May 4, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 17, § 1, effective May 4, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 221, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 273, § 1, effective July 2, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 311, § 1, effective July 5, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 332, § 1, effective July 6, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 406, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

3-7-20.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 22; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 9; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 181, § 1.

3-7-21.
Appeals from the local boards to director.

Upon the application of any petitioner for a license, or of any person authorized to protest against the granting of a license, including those persons granted standing pursuant to §

3-5-19

, or upon the application of any licensee whose license has been revoked or suspended by any local board or authority, the director has the right to review the decision of any local board, and after hearing, to confirm or reverse the decision of the local board in whole or in part, and to make any decision or order he or she considers proper, but the application shall be made within ten (10) days after the making of the decision or order sought to be reviewed. Notice of the decision or order shall be given by the local or licensing board to the applicant within twenty-four (24) hours after the making of its decision or order and the decision or order shall not be suspended except by the order of the director.

Any appeal or appeals from a decision of any boards located in the towns of Jamestown, Little Compton, Middletown, Portsmouth or Tiverton, or in the city of Newport shall be heard by the director or the director’s designee within Newport County. The petitioner shall provide a stenographer and shall bear the cost to have a transcript made of the proceedings. A free copy of the transcript shall be provided by the petitioner to the director upon receipt of the transcript.

The director may accept into evidence a stenographic transcript of a witness’s sworn testimony presented before the local board that was subject to cross examination. This testimony may be rebutted by competent testimony presented at the hearing held by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 14; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 9; P.L. 1948, ch. 2124, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-21

; P.L. 1981, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 337, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 10.

3-7-22.
Manufacturer’s or wholesaler’s interest in retailer.

Except as otherwise provided, it shall be unlawful for any holder of a manufacturer’s or wholesaler’s license to have any direct or indirect interest in any retailer’s license or in the business carried on under a retailer’s license. If by operation of law the holder of a manufacturer’s or wholesaler’s license acquires an interest in a retailer’s license, or in the business carried on under a retailer’s license, he or she shall within thirty (30) days after acquiring that interest report the interest to the department and shall dispose of that interest in accordance with the directions of the department. Any person willfully violating the provisions of this section shall forfeit his or her manufacturer’s license and his or her interest in the retailer’s license.

The holder of a license issued pursuant to §

3-6-1.1

, et seq., located at 162 West Main Road, Little Compton, Rhode Island may have a direct or indirect interest in a Class B license, provided, that the holder shall remain obligated to comply with §

3-7-18

and §

3-5-11.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-22

; P.L. 2013, ch. 519, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 530, § 1.

3-7-23.
Closing hours for Class A licenses.

The following closing hours shall be observed by all Class A license holders:

November 1 to May 31. No holder of a Class A license shall sell or deliver beverage under that license between the hours of ten o’clock (10:00) p.m. and seven o’clock (7:00) a.m. (local time), except on legal holiday eves at which time the closing hour shall be eleven o’clock (11:00) p.m. In the city of Providence, no holder of a Class A license shall sell or deliver beverages under that license between the hours of ten o’clock (10:00) p.m. and nine o’clock (9:00) a.m. (local time), except on legal holiday eves at which time the closing hour shall be eleven o’clock (11:00) p.m. In the city of Central Falls, no holder of a Class A license shall sell or deliver beverages under that license between the hours of ten o’clock (10:00) p.m. and nine o’clock (9:00) a.m. local time. In the city of Pawtucket, no holder of a Class A license shall sell or deliver beverages under that license between the hours of ten o’clock (10:00) p.m. and nine o’clock (9:00) a.m. (local time), except on legal holiday eves at which time the closing hour shall be eleven o’clock (11:00) p.m. When a legal holiday is celebrated on a Monday, the preceding Saturday shall be considered the holiday eve.

June 1 to October 31. No holder of a class A license shall sell or deliver beverages under this license between the hours of eleven o’clock (11:00) p.m. and seven o’clock (7:00) a.m. (local time). In the cities of Providence, Central Falls, and Pawtucket, no holder of a Class A license shall sell or deliver beverages under that license between the hours of eleven o’clock (11:00) p.m. and nine o’clock (9:00) a.m. (local time).

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-7-23

; P.L. 1968, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 55, § 1, effective September 1, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 56, § 1, effective September 1, 2022.

3-7-24.
Certificate of payment of state taxes.

Every licensee under this chapter, upon filing an application for renewal or transfer of a license, shall submit with the application a certificate executed by the tax administrator, or some employee designated by the tax administrator, that taxes due the state have been paid. For the purposes of this section, “taxes due the state” shall include contributions due including taxes, interest and penalties due to the department of labor and training pursuant to the employment security act, chapters 42-44 of title 28, and temporary disability insurance act, chapters 39-41 of title 28. No license under this chapter shall be renewed or transferred without that certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 155, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 278, § 1.